searchsrv/searchengine/oss/sb/snowball/algorithms/romanian/stem_Unicode.sbl
/*

Copyright (c) 2001, Dr Martin Porter
Copyright (c) 2002, Richard Boulton
All rights reserved.

Redistribution and use in source and binary forms, with 
or without modification, are permitted provided that the 
following conditions are met:

*	Redistributions of source code must retain the 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and 
	the following disclaimer. 
*	Redistributions in binary form must reproduce 
	above copyright notice, this list of conditions and
 	the following disclaimer in the documentation and/or 
	other materials provided with the distribution. 
*	Neither the name of the <ORGANIZATION> nor the 
	names of its contributors may be used to endorse or 
	promote products derived from this software without
	specific rior written permission. 

THIS SOFTWARE IS PROVIDED BY THE COPYRIGHT HOLDERS AND 
CONTRIBUTORS "AS IS" AND ANY EXPRESS OR IMPLIED WARRANTIES, 
INCLUDING, BUT NOT LIMITED TO, THE IMPLIED WARRANTIES OF 
MERCHANTABILITY AND FITNESS FOR A PARTICULAR PURPOSE ARE 
DISCLAIMED. IN NO EVENT SHALL THE COPYRIGHT OWNER OR 
CONTRIBUTORS BE LIABLE FOR ANY DIRECT, INDIRECT, INCIDENTAL, 
SPECIAL, EXEMPLARY, OR CONSEQUENTIAL DAMAGES (INCLUDING, 
BUT NOT LIMITED TO, PROCUREMENT OF SUBSTITUTE GOODS OR 
SERVICES; LOSS OF USE, DATA, OR PROFITS; OR BUSINESS 
INTERRUPTION) HOWEVER CAUSED AND ON ANY THEORY OF LIABILITY, 
WHETHER IN CONTRACT, STRICT LIABILITY, OR TORT (INCLUDING 
NEGLIGENCE OR OTHERWISE) ARISING IN ANY WAY OUT OF THE USE 
OF THIS SOFTWARE, EVEN IF ADVISED OF THE POSSIBILITY OF SUCH 
DAMAGE.

*/
routines (
           prelude postlude mark_regions
           RV R1 R2
           step_0
           standard_suffix combo_suffix
           verb_suffix
           vowel_suffix
)

externals ( stem )

integers ( pV p1 p2 )

groupings ( v )

booleans  ( standard_suffix_removed )

stringescapes {}

/* special characters */

stringdef a^   hex '0E2'  // a circumflex
stringdef i^   hex '0EE'  // i circumflex
stringdef a+   hex '103'  // a breve
stringdef s,   hex '15F'  // s cedilla
stringdef t,   hex '163'  // t cedilla

define v 'aeiou{a^}{i^}{a+}'

define prelude as (
    repeat goto (
        v [ ('u' ] v <- 'U') or
            ('i' ] v <- 'I')
    )
)

define mark_regions as (

    $pV = limit
    $p1 = limit
    $p2 = limit // defaults

    do (
        ( v (non-v gopast v) or (v gopast non-v) )
        or
        ( non-v (non-v gopast v) or (v next) )
        setmark pV
    )
    do (
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p1
        gopast v gopast non-v setmark p2
    )
)

define postlude as repeat (

    [substring] among(
        'I'  (<- 'i')
        'U'  (<- 'u')
        ''   (next)
    )

)

backwardmode (

    define RV as $pV <= cursor
    define R1 as $p1 <= cursor
    define R2 as $p2 <= cursor

    define step_0 as (
        [substring] R1 among(
            'ul' 'ului'
                ( delete )
            'aua'
                ( <-'a' )
            'ea' 'ele' 'elor'
                ( <-'e' )
            'ii' 'iua' 'iei' 'iile' 'iilor' 'ilor'
                ( <-'i')
            'ile'
                ( not 'ab' <- 'i' )
            'atei'
                ( <- 'at' )
            'a{t,}ie' 'a{t,}ia'
                ( <- 'a{t,}i' )
        )
    )

    define combo_suffix as test (
        [substring] R1 (
            among(
            /* 'IST'. alternative: include the following
                'alism' 'alisme'
                'alist' 'alista' 'aliste' 'alisti' 'alist{a+}' 'ali{s,}ti' (
                    <- 'al'
                )
            */
                'abilitate' 'abilitati' 'abilit{a+}i' 'abilit{a+}{t,}i' (
                    <- 'abil'
                )
                'ibilitate' (
                    <- 'ibil'
                )
                'ivitate' 'ivitati' 'ivit{a+}i' 'ivit{a+}{t,}i' (
                    <- 'iv'
                )
                'icitate' 'icitati' 'icit{a+}i' 'icit{a+}{t,}i'
                'icator' 'icatori'
                'iciv' 'iciva' 'icive' 'icivi' 'iciv{a+}'
                'ical' 'icala' 'icale' 'icali' 'ical{a+}' (
                    <- 'ic'
                )
                'ativ' 'ativa' 'ative' 'ativi' 'ativ{a+}' 'a{t,}iune'
                'atoare' 'ator' 'atori'
                '{a+}toare' '{a+}tor' '{a+}tori' (
                    <- 'at'
                )
                'itiv' 'itiva' 'itive' 'itivi' 'itiv{a+}' 'i{t,}iune'
                'itoare' 'itor' 'itori' (
                    <- 'it'
                )
            )
            set standard_suffix_removed
        )
    )

    define standard_suffix as (
        unset standard_suffix_removed
        repeat combo_suffix
        [substring] R2 (
            among(

                // past participle is treated here, rather than
                // as a verb ending:
                'at' 'ata' 'at{a+}' 'ati' 'ate'
                'ut' 'uta' 'ut{a+}' 'uti' 'ute'
                'it' 'ita' 'it{a+}' 'iti' 'ite'

                'ic' 'ica' 'ice' 'ici' 'ic{a+}'
                'abil' 'abila' 'abile' 'abili' 'abil{a+}'
                'ibil' 'ibila' 'ibile' 'ibili' 'ibil{a+}'
                'oasa' 'oas{a+}' 'oase' 'os' 'osi' 'o{s,}i'
                'ant' 'anta' 'ante' 'anti' 'ant{a+}'
                'ator' 'atori'
                'itate' 'itati' 'it{a+}i' 'it{a+}{t,}i'
                'iv' 'iva' 'ive' 'ivi' 'iv{a+}' (
                    delete
                )
                'iune' 'iuni' (
                    '{t,}'] <- 't'
                )
                'ism' 'isme'
                'ist' 'ista' 'iste' 'isti' 'ist{a+}' 'i{s,}ti' (
                    <- 'ist'
                    /* 'IST'. alternative: remove with <- '' */
                )
            )
            set standard_suffix_removed
        )
    )

    define verb_suffix as setlimit tomark pV for (
        [substring] among(
            // 'long' infinitive:
            'are' 'ere' 'ire' '{a^}re'

            // gerund:
            'ind' '{a^}nd'
            'indu' '{a^}ndu'

            'eze'
            'easc{a+}'
            // present:
            'ez' 'ezi' 'eaz{a+}' 'esc' 'e{s,}ti'
            'e{s,}te'
            '{a+}sc' '{a+}{s,}ti'
            '{a+}{s,}te'

            // imperfect:
            'am' 'ai' 'au'
            'eam' 'eai' 'ea' 'ea{t,}i' 'eau'
            'iam' 'iai' 'ia' 'ia{t,}i' 'iau'

            // past: // (not 'ii')
            'ui'
            'a{s,}i' 'ar{a+}m' 'ar{a+}{t,}i' 'ar{a+}'
            'u{s,}i' 'ur{a+}m' 'ur{a+}{t,}i' 'ur{a+}'
            'i{s,}i' 'ir{a+}m' 'ir{a+}{t,}i' 'ir{a+}'
            '{a^}i' '{a^}{s,}i' '{a^}r{a+}m' '{a^}r{a+}{t,}i' '{a^}r{a+}'

            // pluferfect:
            'asem' 'ase{s,}i' 'ase' 'aser{a+}m' 'aser{a+}{t,}i' 'aser{a+}'
            'isem' 'ise{s,}i' 'ise' 'iser{a+}m' 'iser{a+}{t,}i' 'iser{a+}'
            '{a^}sem' '{a^}se{s,}i' '{a^}se' '{a^}ser{a+}m' '{a^}ser{a+}{t,}i'
            '{a^}ser{a+}'
            'usem' 'use{s,}i' 'use' 'user{a+}m' 'user{a+}{t,}i' 'user{a+}'

                ( non-v or 'u'  delete )

            // present:
            '{a+}m' 'a{t,}i'
            'em' 'e{t,}i'
            'im' 'i{t,}i'
            '{a^}m' '{a^}{t,}i'

            // past:
            'se{s,}i' 'ser{a+}m' 'ser{a+}{t,}i' 'ser{a+}'
            'sei' 'se'

            // pluperfect:
            'sesem' 'sese{s,}i' 'sese' 'seser{a+}m' 'seser{a+}{t,}i' 'seser{a+}'
                (delete)
        )
    )

    define vowel_suffix as (
        [substring] RV among (
            'a' 'e' 'i' 'ie' '{a+}' ( delete )
        )
    )
)

define stem as (
    do prelude
    do mark_regions
    backwards (
        do step_0
        do standard_suffix
        do ( standard_suffix_removed or verb_suffix )
        do vowel_suffix
    )
    do postlude
)
